North Dakota statutes. TITLE 21 Governmental Finance
CHAPTER 21-03 Bonds

21-03-01.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires:

“Governing body” means a board of county commissioners, city council, board of city commissioners, school board of any school district, and the similarly constituted and acting board of any other municipality enumerated in subsection 3.

“Initial resolution” means any resolution or ordinance adopted pursuant to section 21-03-09, by which a proceeding is instituted for the purpose of authorizing a municipality to borrow money and issue bonds.

“Municipality” means a county, city, township, public school district, park district, recreation service district, or rural fire protection district empowered to borrow money and issue written obligations to repay the same out of public funds or revenue.

“Population of a municipality” means its population according to the last officially published United States or state census, whichever was taken latest.

“Recorded” means copied at length in the record book required by section 21-03-17.

“Value of taxable property” or “the assessed valuation” of a municipality means the assessed value of all taxable property in such municipality as determined pursuant to chapter 57-02.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 196, § 1; 1935, ch. 197, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 21-0301; S.L. 1951, ch. 170, § 1; 1953, ch. 168, § 1; 1955, ch. 170, § 1; 1957, ch. 178, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 21-0301; S.L. 1961, ch. 158, § 77; 1967, ch. 323, § 41; 1977, ch. 107, § 2; 1979, ch. 282, § 4; 1981, ch. 270, § 1; 1981, ch. 806, § 2; 1993, ch. 239, § 1.

Cross-References.

Authority for counties or cities to jointly issue bonds, see N.D.C.C. § 54-40-01.

North Dakota Public Finance Authority Act, see N.D.C.C. ch. 6-09.4.

Municipal industrial development general obligation bonds subject to this chapter, see N.D.C.C. § 40-57-19.

Word defined by statute always has same meaning, see N.D.C.C. § 1-01-09.

21-03-02.
Provisions not applicable to certain issues.

This chapter is not applicable:

To issues of bonds, warrants, or other forms of public securities issued on account of public improvements and for the payment of which special assessments are or shall be levied upon and against property benefited thereby which do not constitute, at the time of their issuance, a general obligation or fixed liability of the municipality issuing the same, nor the portion of any such issue payable by general taxation on account of assumption of a portion of the cost of such improvement under section 40-24-10 or any similar law. Nothing in this subsection may be construed to prevent the issuance of bonds by any city for the purposes specified in subdivision g of subsection 2 of section 21-03-06.

To drainage bonds or irrigation bonds.

To borrowing of money in anticipation of tax collections by means of certificates of indebtedness, as provided by chapter 21-02.

To revenue bonds under the provisions of chapter 40-35.

To bank or credit union loans authorized in title 21.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 196, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 21-0302; S.L. 1967, ch. 323, § 42; 1973, ch. 211, § 1; 1993, ch. 239, § 2; 1993, ch. 240, § 1; 2015, ch. 184, § 3, effective August 1, 2015.

Cross-References.

Drainage district bonds, see N.D.C.C. §§ 61-21-53 to 61-21-55.

Irrigation district bonds, see N.D.C.C. chs. 61-07 to 61-09.

21-03-03.
Irregularities do not vitiate bonds.

Defects and irregularities in any proceeding had in substantial compliance with this chapter, when the issue is for a lawful purpose and is unaffected by fraud and does not exceed any constitutional or statutory limitation of amount, do not invalidate the bonds issued nor the indebtedness incurred after the bonds have been sold and the proceeds thereof received by the municipality, nor after the performance of a contract has been entered upon by a party who is to receive the said bonds or the proceeds thereof as consideration for said contract.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 196, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 21-0303.

21-03-03.1.
Validation of certain school district bond issues. [Repealed]

Omitted.

Note.

Omitted as a statute not of a general and permanent nature. For the provisions of this section, see S.L. 1953, ch. 169, §§ 1, 2.

21-03-04.
Grant of power to borrow — General limitations of indebtedness.

Every municipality may borrow money and issue municipal obligations thereof for the purpose specified and by the procedure provided in this chapter, and for no other purpose and in no other manner, except as otherwise provided in section 21-03-02. No municipality may incur indebtedness in any manner or for any purpose in an amount which, with all other outstanding indebtedness of the municipality, exceeds five percent of the assessed value of the taxable property therein, except:

Any incorporated city, by a two-thirds vote of the qualified voters thereof voting upon said question at a general or special election, may increase such limit of indebtedness three percent on such assessed value beyond said five percent limit, and a school district, by a majority vote of the qualified voters thereof voting upon said question at a general or special election, may increase such limitation of indebtedness five percent on such assessed value beyond the said five percent limit.

Any county or city, when authorized by a majority vote of the qualified voters thereof voting upon said question at a general or special election, may issue bonds upon any revenue-producing utility owned by such county or city, for the purchase or acquisition of such utility, or the building or establishment thereof, in amounts not exceeding the physical value of such utility, industry, or enterprise.

Any incorporated city, if authorized by a majority vote of the qualified voters thereof voting upon said question at a general or special election, may become indebted in any amount not exceeding four percent of such assessed value, without regard to the existing indebtedness of said city, for the purpose of constructing or purchasing waterworks for furnishing a supply of water to the inhabitants of such city or for the purpose of constructing sewers, and for no other purposes whatever, but the aggregate of such additional indebtedness for waterworks and sewers never may exceed such four percent over and above the limitations of indebtedness in this section heretofore prescribed.

All bonds or obligations in excess of the amount of indebtedness permitted by this chapter, given by any municipality as herein defined, are void.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 196, § 3, subs. 1; R.C. 1943, § 21-0304; S.L. 1965, ch. 183, § 1; 1967, ch. 189, § 1.

Cross-References.

Debt limit, see N.D. Const. art. X, § 15.

Election to increase debt limit of school district, see N.D.C.C. §§ 15.1-07-03 to 15.1-07-07.

21-03-05.
Limitation applicable to independent municipal indebtedness.

The amount limited in section 21-03-04 includes such indebtedness only as may be incurred independently by a municipality for its own separate purposes and does not include any indebtedness, in whole or in part, that may be incurred independently by any other municipality for its own separate purposes, even though the territory and taxable property of either municipality constitutes the whole or a part of the territory and taxable property of the other.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 196, § 3, subs. 2; R.C. 1943, § 21-0305.

21-03-06.
Purposes and specific limitations of bond issues.

Municipalities are empowered to borrow money, subject to the general limitations of amounts prescribed by sections 21-03-04 and 21-03-05, and subject, in certain cases, to the further limitations prescribed by the section, and to issue bonds thereof for the purposes enumerated in the section. Such bonds may be issued:

By any county:

To provide county buildings and to acquire land for county purposes, but all outstanding unpaid bonds for this purpose may not exceed in amount at any one time five percent of the value of taxable property in such county.

To construct, enlarge, or repair, or aid in the construction, enlargement, or repair, of bridges within or without the county, but all outstanding unpaid bonds for this purpose may not exceed in amount at any one time one percent of the value of taxable property in the county.

To provide funds for the original construction and for the improvement and maintenance of highways, but all outstanding unpaid bonds for these purposes may not exceed in amount at any one time four percent of the value of taxable property in such county.

To provide funds for the construction of solid waste disposal facilities, for the acquisition of real estate for that purpose, for facilities and equipment for the collection of solid wastes, and for facilities and equipment to dispose of waste products.

To provide money for the payment of any deficiency in the fund of any special improvement district whenever the special assessment or taxes levied and collected for the specific improvements are insufficient to pay the principal or interest of any special improvement warrants or bonds issued for the improvement and due and unpaid, but only to the extent of that deficiency.

To provide funds for the acquiring, laying out, equipping, and improving parks and recreational facilities and to acquire land for these purposes.

To provide funds to purchase not to exceed two hundred forty acres [97.12 hectares] of real estate and construct buildings and improvements for the conduct of a county fair.

By any city:

For the erection, purchase, construction, enlargement, or repair of municipal or public buildings for the following purposes: city halls, fire protection buildings, waterworks buildings, police stations, city markets, public baths, hospitals, libraries, museums, auditoriums, armories, gymnasiums, and music halls; and to purchase and acquire sites for such buildings, and for the equipment and furnishing thereof.

For the purchase of fire engines and other equipment and materials for fire protection and for the purchase, construction, and installation of pumps, watermains, reservoirs, and other necessary facilities for fire protection.

For the construction and extension of water plants or the purchase of existing plants; the construction and improvement of watermains, sewers, and drains; or for the joint construction and establishment of a water and sewer system; or for the erection, planning, construction, and establishment of a sewage disposal plant or system; or for the erection, construction, and enlargement of garbage disposal plants and to purchase sites and grounds, either within or without the limits of the city, for the disposal of sewage, garbage, and other refuse; or for the leasing or purchase of lands, either within or without the limits of the city, for the purpose of providing airports or landing fields or for the construction of buildings thereon or the procuring of equipment therefor; and other like municipal purposes.

To construct, acquire, enlarge, extend, or maintain any plant or equipment, or any part of a plant or equipment, for the production, transmission, delivery or furnishing of heat, light, or power, either directly or indirectly, to or for the public, or to enlarge and extend such plants or equipment or any part thereof. This subdivision may not be construed as an amendment to sections 40-33-01 to 40-33-09, nor to section 40-33-15.

To purchase, acquire, or establish any public utility and in cities having a population of more than five thousand to purchase or acquire a public transportation system. This subdivision may not be construed as impairing, altering, or affecting the powers of the public service commission in any such proceeding.

To provide for acquiring, laying out, and improving parks, parkways, park buildings, public drives, boulevards, highways, streets, state highways, and cemeteries, and to acquire land for these purposes.

To provide money for the payment of any deficiency in the fund of any special improvement district whenever the special assessment or taxes levied and collected for the specific improvements are then insufficient to pay the principal or interest of any special improvement warrants issued for such improvement and then due and unpaid, but only to the extent of such deficiency.

For the purchase of automobiles, trucks, tractors, flushers, sprinklers, street sweepers, graders, rollers, loaders, plows, conveyors and other machinery, equipment and materials for the cleaning, flushing, and sweeping of any street, highway, avenue, alley, or public place within the city, the removal of snow and ice therefrom, and other like municipal purposes.

For the purchase of trucks, garbage collectors, and other vehicles, equipment and materials for the collection, removal, and disposal of garbage, rubbish, ashes, refuse, and other wastes within the city.

To provide for the acquiring and constructing of parking lots and facilities for motor vehicle parking.

To provide funds for the erection, purchase, construction, enlargement, or repair of bridges, and to purchase and acquire necessary real estate, sites, or easements for such bridges.

To provide funds for all works in connection with flood control and the necessary land or easements for such flood control works.

To provide required matching funds for a capital construction project at a state institution of higher education located within the city for which an appropriation has been made by the legislative assembly. Bonds issued under this subdivision are deemed to be issued for corporation purposes under subsection 5 of section 40-05-01.

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 323, § 285.

By any public school district, or the school district of the city of Fargo, to purchase, erect, enlarge, and improve school buildings and teacherages, to acquire sites therefor and for playgrounds, to furnish and equip the same with heat, light, and ventilation or other necessary apparatus, to pay advance rentals to the state school construction fund, and also to purchase schoolbus equipment which must meet the standards set up by the state superintendent of public instruction and the director of the department of transportation.

By any township:

For the erection of a township hall and the purchase of a site therefor; and

For the construction of roads and bridges, but all outstanding unpaid bonds for road and bridge purposes may not exceed in amount at any one time one and one-half percent of the value of the taxable property in such township.

By any park district which constitutes a distinct municipality, to provide for acquiring, laying out, and improving parks, parkways, boulevards, and pleasure drives, and to acquire land for these purposes, but such indebtedness may not at any time exceed one percent of the value of the taxable property in such park district.

By any municipality as herein defined:

For the purpose of paying any final judgment obtained against the municipality within the state of North Dakota in case the governing body does not deem it advisable to pay such judgment out of current revenues. In case the bonds authorized by this subsection cannot be sold in accordance with this chapter, they may be issued to the judgment creditor in payment of such judgment.

To provide necessary funds for the payment of the principal and interest of bonds of such municipality, due or about to become due, for the payment of which the municipality has not sufficient funds, but only to the extent of such deficit; or to refund outstanding bonds of the municipality which are called for redemption and prepayment in accordance with their terms, or by the consent of the holders thereof, within six months from the date of the refunding bonds, when in the judgment of the governing body the best interests of the municipality will be served thereby, through the reduction of interest cost or the extension of maturities.

To refund outstanding bonds not yet due or to become due or subject to redemption and prepayment within six months, when in the judgment of the governing body the best interests of the municipality will be served thereby, through the reduction of debt service costs or the extension or adjustment of maturities in relation to the resources available for their payment. The proceeds of the refunding bonds, including any premium and accrued interest, must be deposited in escrow with a suitable bank or trust company, having its principal place of business within or without the state, and must be invested in such amount and in securities maturing on such dates and bearing interest at such rates as are required to provide funds sufficient to pay when due the interest to accrue on each bond refunded to its maturity or, if it is prepayable and called for redemption, to an earlier prior date upon which it may be called for redemption, and to pay and redeem the principal amount of each such bond at maturity or, if prepayable and called for redemption, at the earlier redemption date, and pay any premium required for redemption on such date; or in the case of a crossover refunding, must be invested in securities irrevocably appropriated to the payment of principal and interest on the refunding bonds until the date the proceeds are applied to the payment or redemption of the bonds to be refunded. The governing body’s resolution authorizing the refunding bonds shall irrevocably appropriate for these purposes the escrow fund and all investments thereof, which must be held in safekeeping by the escrow agent, and all income therefrom, and may provide for the call for redemption of all prepayable bonds in accordance with their terms. The securities to be purchased with the escrow fund must be limited to general obligations of the United States, securities whose principal and interest payments are guaranteed by the United States, and securities issued by the following United States government agencies: banks for cooperatives, federal home loan banks, federal intermediate credit banks, federal land banks, and the federal national mortgage association. Such securities must be purchased simultaneously with the delivery of the refunding bonds. Moneys on hand in the sinking fund maintained for the payment of the outstanding bonds, and not immediately needed for the payment of interest or principal due, or other legally available funds of the municipality may likewise be deposited in the escrow fund and invested in the same manner as the proceeds of the refunding bonds, to the extent consistent with the provisions of resolutions authorizing the outstanding bonds.

By any recreation service district:

For the construction and extension of water plants or the purchase of existing plants; the construction and improvement of watermains, sewers, and drains; or for the joint construction and establishment of a water and sewer system; or for the erection, planning, construction, and establishment of a sewage disposal plant or system; or for the erection, construction, and enlargement of garbage disposal plants and to purchase sites and grounds, either within or without the limits of the recreation service district, for the disposal of sewage, garbage, and other refuse; and other like recreation service district purposes.

To provide for acquiring, laying out, and improving parks, parkways, park buildings, public drives, boulevards, highways, streets, state highways, and to acquire land for these purposes.

To provide money for the payment of any deficiency in the fund of any special improvement district whenever the special assessment or taxes levied and collected for the specific improvements are then insufficient to pay the principal or interest of any special improvement warrants issued for such improvement and then due and unpaid, but only to the extent of such deficiency.

For the purchase of trucks, garbage collectors, and other vehicles, equipment, and materials for the collection, removal, and disposal of garbage, rubbish, ashes, refuse, and other wastes within the recreation service district.

For the purpose of providing services described in section 11-28.2-04.

For the purpose of dredging any waters or waterways within or contiguous to the recreation service district.

By any rural fire protection district for the purchase of such firefighting equipment, ambulances, or other emergency vehicles, or the acquisition, construction, and equipping of such real property and improvements thereto, as is necessary and proper to carry out the general fire protection program of the district.

4.1.

By any school district having a community or junior college or off-campus educational center as provided in chapter 15-18 which has an enrollment of one thousand or more students, upon motion of the governing body, for capital construction purposes, including the construction and equipping of new buildings or repairing or renovating and equipping existing buildings. The governing body may levy a tax not exceeding two mills on the dollar of the taxable valuation of the school district for the purpose of paying the principal and interest on bonds issued pursuant to this subsection. The mill levy authorized by this subsection is in addition to any mill levy limitations provided by law. The total principal amount of bonds issued pursuant to this subsection may not exceed seven hundred thousand dollars, and any indebtedness incurred by a school district must be within debt limitations established by law. Bonds issued under this subsection must never become a general obligation of this state.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 196, § 4; 1929, ch. 169, § 1; 1929, ch. 170, § 1; 1931, ch. 195, § 1; 1939, ch. 173, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 21-0306; S.L. 1947, ch. 190, § 1; 1947, ch. 196, § 2; 1949, ch. 185, § 1; 1949, ch. 186, §§ 1, 2; 1953, ch. 170, § 1; 1955, ch. 174, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 21-0306; S.L. 1961, ch. 158, § 78; 1961, ch. 195, § 1; 1965, ch. 182, § 1; 1965, ch. 183, § 6; 1967, ch. 189, § 2; 1967, ch. 323, § 285; 1971, ch. 251, § 1; 1975, ch. 92, § 1; 1975, ch. 216, § 1; 1977, ch. 107, § 3; 1979, ch. 282, § 5; 1981, ch. 146, § 2; 1981, ch. 149, § 4; 1981, ch. 271, § 1; 1981, ch. 272, § 1; 1981, ch. 273, § 1; 1983, ch. 149, § 2; 1983, ch. 279, § 1; 1983, ch. 593, § 13; 1983, ch. 606, § 30; 1983, ch. 608, § 9; 1987, ch. 236, § 2; 1989, ch. 145, § 5; 1995, ch. 238, § 1; 2015, ch. 439, § 23, effective January 1, 2015.

Cross-References.

Airport property, bond issue for purchase of, see N.D.C.C. § 2-02-03.

Bridges, bonds for cost of construction, see N.D.C.C. § 24-08-07.

Housing authority bonds, see N.D.C.C. ch. 23-11.

Industrial development, provisions governing revenue bonds, see N.D.C.C. § 40-57-09.

Judgments against cities, negotiable bearer bonds authorized, see N.D.C.C. § 40-43-03.

Park commissioners, power to issue bonds, see N.D.C.C. § 40-49-12.

Parking authority, bond issues, see N.D.C.C. § 40-61-08.

Parking facilities, issuance of bonds authorized, see N.D.C.C. § 40-60-02.

Pedestrian malls, issuance of bonds authorized, see N.D.C.C. § 40-62-01.

Power of municipalities to issue bonds, generally, see §§ 40-05-01, 40-05.1-06.

Recreation system, bond issues authorized, see N.D.C.C. § 40-55-05.

Revenue bond law, see N.D.C.C. ch. 40-35.

Revenue bond refinancing law, see N.D.C.C. ch. 40-36.

Securities registration requirements, exemption from, see N.D.C.C. § 10-04-05.

Sewage or garbage disposal improvements, bond issues, see N.D.C.C. §§ 40-34-02 to 40-34-04.

Special assessment warrants, funding and refunding, see N.D.C.C. ch. 40-27.

Steam heating authorities, see N.D.C.C. § 40-33.1-04.

Transportation system, revenue bonds, see N.D.C.C. §§ 40-33-26 to 40-33-29.

Urban renewal, issuance of bonds, see N.D.C.C. § 40-58-10.

Utilities, issuance of bonds, see N.D.C.C. §§ 40-33-04, 40-33-07.

Water treatment plants, issuance of revenue bonds, see N.D.C.C. §§ 40-33-17 to 40-33-21.

21-03-06.1.
School district voter approval of building authority or other indirect funding methods — Building construction project approval.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a school board may not enter an agreement pursuant to internal revenue service revenue ruling 63-20 under which payments of any kind would be required by the school district to any building authority or other entity that incurs indebtedness or other obligation in connection with acquisition, improvements, or construction of any property or structure at a total cost of four million dollars or more to be used by the school district unless the agreement has been approved by a vote of a majority of the qualified electors of the school district voting on the question at a regular or special school district election if the agreement is for acquisition, improvements, or construction of any property or structure for which an election would be required if the school district undertook the acquisition, improvements, or construction project through issuance of bonds of the school district.

The school board of a school district may not enter an agreement pursuant to internal revenue service revenue ruling 63-20 under which payments of any kind would be required by the school district to any building authority or other entity that incurs indebtedness or other obligation regarding construction, purchase, repair, improvement, modernization, or renovation of any building or facility to be used by the school district without approval by the superintendent of public instruction in the manner provided in section 15.1-36-01, if the approval by the superintendent of public instruction would be required for the project under section 15.1-36-01 if the school district undertook the project itself.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 200, § 1.

21-03-07.
Election required — Exceptions. [Effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2020]

No municipality, and no governing board thereof, may issue bonds without being first authorized to do so by a vote equal to sixty percent of all the qualified voters of such municipality voting upon the question of such issue except:

As otherwise provided in section 21-03-04.

The governing body may issue bonds of the municipality for the purpose and within the limitations specified by subdivision e of subsection 1 of section 21-03-06, subdivision g of subsection 2 of section 21-03-06, and subsections 4.1 and 7 of section 21-03-06 without an election.

The governing body of any municipality may issue bonds of the municipality for the purpose of providing funds to meet its share of the cost of any highway project undertaken under an agreement entered into by the governing body with the United States government, the director of the department of transportation, the board of county commissioners, or any of them, including the cost of any construction, improvement, financing, planning, and acquisition of right of way of a bridge eligible for matching funds, highway routed through the municipality and of any bridges and controlled access facilities thereon and any necessary additional width or capacity of the bridge or roadway thereof greater than that required for federal or state bridge or highway purposes, and of any necessary relaying of utility mains and conduits, curbs and gutters, and the installation of utility service connections and streetlights. The portion of the total cost of the project to be paid by the municipality under the agreement, including all items of cost incurred directly by the municipality and all amounts to be paid by it for work done or contracted for by other parties to the agreement, may not exceed a sum equal to thirty percent of the total cost, including engineering and other incidental costs, of all construction and reconstruction work to be done plus fifty percent of the total cost of all right of way to be acquired in connection therewith. The initial resolution authorizing issuance of bonds under this subsection must be published in the official newspaper of the municipality. Within sixty days after publication, an owner of taxable property within the municipality may file with the auditor or chief fiscal officer of the municipality a written protest against adoption of the resolution. A protest must describe the property that is the subject of the protest. If the governing body finds protests have been signed by the owners of taxable property having an assessed valuation equal to five percent or more of the assessed valuation of all taxable property in the municipality, as most recently finally equalized, all further proceedings under the initial resolution are barred. Nothing herein may be deemed to prevent any municipality from appropriating funds for or financing out of taxes, special assessments, or utility revenues any work incidental to any such project, in the manner and to the extent otherwise permitted by law, and the cost of any work so financed may not be included in computing the portion of the project cost payable by the municipality, within the meaning of this subsection, unless the work is actually called for by the agreement between the municipality and the other governmental agencies involved.

The governing body of any city may also by resolution adopted by a two-thirds vote authorize and issue general obligation bonds of the city for the purpose of providing funds to pay the cost of any improvement of the types stated below, to the extent that the governing body determines that such cost should be paid by the city and should not be assessed upon property specially benefited thereby; provided that the initial resolution authorizing such bonds must be published in the official newspaper, and any owner of taxable property within the city may, within sixty days after such publication, file with the city auditor a protest against the adoption of the resolution. If the governing body finds such protests to have been signed by the owners of taxable property having an assessed valuation equal to five percent or more of the assessed valuation of all taxable property within the city, as theretofore last finally equalized, all further proceedings under such initial resolution are barred. This procedure is authorized for the financing of the following types of improvements:

Any street improvement, as defined in subsection 2 of section 40-22-01, to be made in or upon any federal or state highway or any other street designated by ordinance as an arterial street.

The construction of a bridge, culvert, overpass, or underpass at the intersection of any street with a stream, watercourse, drain, or railway, and the acquisition of any land or easement required for that purpose.

Any improvement incidental to the carrying out of an urban renewal project, the issuance of bonds for which is authorized by subsection 4 of section 40-58-13.

The governing body of any city may also by resolution adopted by a two-thirds vote dedicate the mill levy authorized by section 57-15-42 and may authorize and issue general obligation bonds to be paid by the dedicated levy for the purpose of providing funds for the purchase, construction, reconstruction, or repair of public buildings or fire stations; provided, that the initial resolution authorizing the mill levy dedication and general obligation bonds must be published in the official newspaper, and any owner of taxable property within the city may, within sixty days after publication, file with the city auditor a protest against the adoption of the resolution. Protests must be in writing and must describe the property which is the subject of the protest. If the governing body finds such protests to have been signed by the owners of taxable property having an assessed valuation equal to five percent or more of the assessed valuation of all taxable property within the city, as theretofore last finally equalized, all further proceedings under the initial resolution are barred.

The governing body of any county may also by resolution adopted by a two-thirds vote dedicate the tax levies authorized by section 57-15-06.6 and subsection 5 of section 57-15-06.7 and may authorize and issue general obligation bonds to be paid by the dedicated levy for the purposes identified under section 57-15-06.6 and subsection 5 of section 57-15-06.7; provided, that the initial resolution authorizing the tax levy dedication and general obligation bonds must be published in the official newspaper, and any owner of taxable property within the county may, within sixty days after publication, file with the county auditor a protest against the adoption of the resolution. Protests must be in writing and must describe the property which is the subject of the protest. If the governing body finds such protests to have been signed by the owners of taxable property having an assessed valuation equal to five percent or more of the assessed valuation of all taxable property within the county, as last finally equalized, all further proceedings under the initial resolution are barred.

The governing body of any public school district may also by resolution adopted by a two-thirds vote dedicate the tax levies as authorized by section 15.1-09-47, 15.1-09-49, or 57-15-16 and may authorize and issue general obligation bonds to be paid by these dedicated levies for the purpose of providing funds for the purchase, construction, reconstruction, or repair of public school buildings or for the construction or improvement of a project under section 15.1-36-02 or 15.1-36-08. The initial resolution authorizing the tax levy dedication and general obligation bonds must be published in the official newspaper of the school district, and any owner of taxable property within the school district may, within sixty days after publication, file with the business manager of the school district a protest against the adoption of the resolution. Protests must be in writing and must describe the property that is the subject of the protest. If the governing body finds the protests have been signed by the owners of taxable property having an assessed valuation equal to five percent or more of the assessed valuation of all taxable property within the school district, as theretofore last finally equalized, all further proceedings under the initial resolution are barred.

The governing body of any city having a population of twenty-five thousand persons or more may use the provisions of subsection 3 to provide funds to participate in the cost of any construction, improvement, financing, and planning of any bypass routes, interchanges, or other intersection improvements on a federal or state highway system which is situated in whole or in part outside of the corporate limits of the city; provided, that the governing body thereof shall determine by resolution that the undertaking of such work is in the best interest of the city for the purpose of providing access and relieving congestion or improving traffic flow on municipal streets.

The governing body of a municipality or other political subdivision, located at least in part within a county that is included within a disaster or emergency executive order or proclamation of the governor under chapter 37-17.1, may by resolution adopted by a two-thirds vote authorize and issue general obligation bonds of the political subdivision without an election for the purpose of providing funds to pay costs associated with the emergency condition. The political subdivision may dedicate and levy taxes for retirement of bonds under this subsection and such levies are not subject to limitations as otherwise provided by law.

The governing board of any county, city, public school district, park district, or township may by resolution adopted by a two-thirds vote dedicate the tax levy authorized by section 57-15-41 and authorize and issue general obligation bonds to be paid by the dedicated levy for the purpose of providing funds to prepay outstanding special assessments made in accordance with the provisions of title 40 against property owned by the county, city, public school district, park district, or township.

The governing body of any park district that constitutes a distinct municipality may issue general obligation bonds of the park district for the purpose of providing funds to acquire, lay out, and improve parks, parkways, boulevards, and pleasure drives, and to acquire land for these purposes, but the indebtedness may not at any time exceed one percent of the assessed valuation of the taxable property in the park district. The initial resolution authorizing the issuance of general obligation bonds under this subsection must be published in the official newspaper of the park district, and any owner of taxable property within the park district may, within sixty days after publication, file with the clerk of the park district a protest against the adoption of the resolution. Protests must be in writing and must describe the property that is the subject of the protest. If the governing body finds the protests have been signed by the owners of taxable property having an assessed valuation equal to five percent or more of the assessed valuation of all taxable property within the park district, as last finally equalized, all further proceedings under the initial resolution are barred.

Nothing herein may be deemed to prevent any municipality from appropriating funds for or financing out of taxes, special assessments, or utility revenues any work incidental to any such improvement, in the manner and to the extent otherwise permitted by law.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 196, § 5; 1933, ch. 170, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 21-0307; S.L. 1947, ch. 192, § 1; 1947, ch. 195, § 1; 1951, ch. 171, § 1; 1957, ch. 179, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 21-0307; S.L. 1967, ch. 192, § 1; 1967, ch. 323, § 43; 1969, ch. 247, §§ 1, 2; 1971, ch. 251, § 2; 1975, ch. 217, § 1; 1975, ch. 218, § 1; 1975, ch. 219, § 1; 1977, ch. 375, § 1; 1983, ch. 82, § 44; 1983, ch. 149, § 3; 1985, ch. 281, § 1; 1989, ch. 145, § 6; 1989, ch. 209, § 8; 1989, ch. 290, § 1; 1989, ch. 291, § 1; 1993, ch. 186, § 7; 1993, ch. 241, § 1; 1995, ch. 239, § 1; 1997, ch. 222, § 1; 2001, ch. 161, § 23; 2003, ch. 48, § 19; 2015, ch. 439, § 24, effective January 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 368, § 5, effective April 10, 2017; 2019, ch. 204, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 187, § 1, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2020.

21-03-08.
Maximum interest rate, maturity, and denominations.

No bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter may bear interest at a rate or rates and be sold privately at a price resulting in an average net interest cost higher than twelve percent per annum. There is no interest rate ceiling on those issues sold at public sale or to the state of North Dakota or any of its agencies or instrumentalities. No bonds issued under this chapter may run for a longer period than twenty years from their date. The bonds may not bear a date earlier than the date of the election authorizing their issuance, if such election is required, nor earlier than the date of the adoption of the resolution of the governing body determining to issue bonds for which no election is required.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 196, § 6; R.C. 1943, § 21-0308; S.L. 1963, ch. 202, § 1; 1971, ch. 249, § 6; 1981, ch. 269, § 7.